Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB84.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "residual waste" in section 103 of the act of July 7, 1980 (P.L.380, No.97), known as the Solid Waste Management Act, is amended to read:Section 103. Definitions.1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Residual waste."(1) The term includes any of the following:(i) Any garbage, refuse, other discarded material or other waste including solid, liquid, semisolid, or contained gaseous materials resulting from industrial, mining and agricultural operations.(ii) Any sludge from an industrial, mining or agricultural water supply treatment facility, waste water treatment facility or air pollution control facility, provided that it is not hazardous.(iii) Oil-related and gas-related wastewater, tophole water, production water of any type, brine or wastewater sludge from conventional or unconventional oil and gas wells.(2) The term does not include:(i) Coal refuse as defined in the "Coal Refuse Disposal Control Act."(ii) Treatment sludges from coal mine drainage treatment plants, disposal of which is being carried on pursuant to and in compliance with a valid permit issued pursuant to "The Clean Streams Law."(iii) Current generation blast furnace, iron and steel slag if:(A) used onsite as a waste processing liming agent in acid neutralization or onsite in place of aggregate or sold and distributed in the stream of 20250HB0084PN0038 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commerce for consumption, use or further processing into another desired commodity; and(B) managed as an item of commercial value in accordance with industry practices to ensure commercial value.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 304. Prohibition on road spreading and land application of oil and gas wastewater.(a) It shall be unlawful for a person or municipality to dispose , process, beneficially use or reuse oil-related and gas- related wastewater, tophole water, production water of any type, brine or wastewater sludge from conventional or unconventional oil and gas wells:(1) by application, dumping or spreading on any dirt, gravel or paved road for any purpose; or(2) by land application, except for the land application of tophole water at a well site as specified under 25 Pa. Code § 78.60 (relating to discharge requirements) or 78a.60 (relating to discharge requirements) . (b) It shall be unlawful for a vehicle used to transport oil-related and gas-related wastewater, tophole water, production water of any type, brine or wastewater sludge to be equipped with a mechanism that allows the road spreading of oil-related and gas-related wastewater, tophole water, production water of any type, brine or wastewater sludge from conventional or unconventional oil and gas wells in a manner prohibited by subsection (a) . (c) Oil-related and gas-related wastewater, tophole water, production water of any type, brine or wastewater sludge from 20250HB0084PN0038 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 conventional or unconventional oil and gas wells proposed to be used or being used for dust suppression, road deicing or road bed stabilization shall not be considered a coproduct under the regulations promulgated by the department.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0084PN0038 - 4 - 12345